Montana, session 2025, HB202.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 87-6-208, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-6-208. Unlawful use of aircraft. (1) Except as provided in 87-3-126, a person may not:
(a) kill, take, or shoot at hunt any game bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal from an aircraft;
(b) use an aircraft: hunt any game bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal within 24 hours after
utilizing an aircraft to locate or spot any game bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal;
(i) to locate any game animal for the purpose of hunting that animal during the same calendar day
within 48 hours after using the
(ii)(c) utilize an aircraft for the purpose of concentrating, pursuing, driving, rallying, or stirring up any
game bird, migratory bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal; or
(c)(d) if in or using utilizing an aircraft, spot or locate any game bird, game animal, or fur-bearing
animal and communicate the location of the game bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal to any person:
(i) on the ground by means of any air-to-ground communication signal or other device as an aid to
hunting or pursuing wildlife; or
(ii) within the same calendar day 24 hours after using utilizing the aircraft; or
(e) hunt or attempt to hunt any game bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal while in possession
of an unmanned aerial vehicle.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 202
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 202
(2) The provisions of this section do not apply:
(a) during emergency situations;
(b) when search and rescue operations are being conducted; or
(c) for predator control as permitted by the department of livestock; or
(d) when supporting an agricultural operation.
(3) The following penalties apply for a violation of this section:
(a) Unless otherwise provided in this subsection (3), a person convicted of a violation of this
section shall be fined not less than $300 $3,000 or more than $1,000 $10,000 or be imprisoned in the county
detention center for not more than 6 months, or both. In addition, the person, upon conviction or forfeiture of
bond or bail, may be subject to forfeiture of any current hunting, fishing, or trapping license issued by this state
and the privilege to hunt, fish, or trap in this state or to use state lands, as defined in 77-1-101, for recreational
purposes for a period of time set by the court for 36 months from the date of conviction or forfeiture unless the
court imposes a longer period.
(b) If a person is convicted or forfeits bond or bail after being charged with unlawful use of an
aircraft to kill or take a deer, elk, antelope, mountain lion, mountain sheep, moose, wild buffalo, caribou,
mountain goat, black bear, or grizzly bear, the person shall be fined not less than $500 $5,000 or more than
$2,000 $20,000 or be imprisoned in the county detention center for not more than 6 months, or both. In
addition, the person shall forfeit any current hunting, fishing, recreational use, or trapping license issued by this
state and the privilege to hunt, fish, or trap in this state for 30 36 months from the date of conviction or forfeiture
unless the court imposes a longer period.
(c) If a person is convicted or forfeits bond or bail after being charged with unlawful use of an
aircraft to kill or take a fur-bearing animal, the person shall be fined not less than $100 $1,000 or more than
$1,000 $10,000 or be imprisoned in the county detention center for not more than 6 months, or both. In
addition, the person shall forfeit any current hunting, fishing, recreational use, or trapping license issued by this
state and the privilege to hunt, fish, or trap in this state for 24 36 months from the date of conviction or forfeiture
unless the court imposes a longer period, and any pelts possessed unlawfully must be confiscated.
(4) As used in this section, "aircraft" has and "hunt" have the meaning same meanings as provided
in 87-6-101."
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 202
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 202
Section 2. Section 87-6-208, MCA, is amended to read:
"87-6-208. Unlawful use of aircraft. (1) Except as provided in 87-3-126, a person may not:
(a) kill, take, or shoot at hunt any game bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal from an aircraft;
(b) use an aircraft: hunt any game bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal after utilizing an aircraft
within the same calendar day to locate or spot any game bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal;
(i) to locate any game animal for the purpose of hunting that animal during the same calendar
day; or
(ii)(c) utilize an aircraft for the purpose of concentrating, pursuing, driving, rallying, or stirring up any
game bird, migratory bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal; or
(c)(d) if in or using utilizing an aircraft, spot or locate any game bird, game animal, or fur-bearing
animal and communicate the location of the game bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal to any person:
(i) on the ground by means of any air-to-ground communication signal or other device as an aid to
hunting or pursuing wildlife; or
(ii) within the same calendar day after using utilizing the aircraft; or
(e) hunt or attempt to hunt any game bird, game animal, or fur-bearing animal while in possession
of an unmanned aerial vehicle.
(2) The provisions of this section do not apply:
(a) during emergency situations;
(b) when search and rescue operations are being conducted; or
(c) for predator control as permitted by the department of livestock; or
(d) when supporting an agricultural operation.
(3) The following penalties apply for a violation of this section:
(a) Unless otherwise provided in this subsection (3), a person convicted of a violation of this
section shall be fined not less than $300 $3,000 or more than $1,000 $10,000 or be imprisoned in the county
detention center for not more than 6 months, or both. In addition, the person, upon conviction or forfeiture of
bond or bail, may be subject to forfeiture of any current hunting, fishing, or trapping license issued by this state
and the privilege to hunt, fish, or trap in this state or to use state lands, as defined in 77-1-101, for recreational
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 202
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 202
purposes for a period of time set by the court for 36 months from the date of conviction or forfeiture unless the
court imposes a longer period.
(b) If a person is convicted or forfeits bond or bail after being charged with unlawful use of an
aircraft to kill or take a deer, elk, antelope, mountain lion, mountain sheep, moose, wild buffalo, caribou,
mountain goat, black bear, or grizzly bear, the person shall be fined not less than $500 $5,000 or more than
$2,000 $20,000 or be imprisoned in the county detention center for not more than 6 months, or both. In
addition, the person shall forfeit any current hunting, fishing, recreational use, or trapping license issued by this
state and the privilege to hunt, fish, or trap in this state for 30 36 months from the date of conviction or forfeiture
unless the court imposes a longer period.
(c) If a person is convicted or forfeits bond or bail after being charged with unlawful use of an
aircraft to kill or take a fur-bearing animal, the person shall be fined not less than $100 $1,000 or more than
$1,000 $10,000 or be imprisoned in the county detention center for not more than 6 months, or both. In
addition, the person shall forfeit any current hunting, fishing, recreational use, or trapping license issued by this
state and the privilege to hunt, fish, or trap in this state for 24 36 months from the date of conviction or forfeiture
unless the court imposes a longer period, and any pelts possessed unlawfully must be confiscated.
(4) As used in this section, "aircraft" has the meaning and "hunt" have the same meanings as
provided in 87-6-101."
Section 3. Coordination instruction. If both Senate Bill No. 106 and [this act] are passed and
approved and if both contain a section that amends 87-6-208, then the section amending 87-6-208 in Senate
Bill No. 106 is void.
Section 4. Effective dates. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2), [this act] is effective on passage
and approval.
(2) [Section 2] is effective January 1, 2027.
Section 5. Termination. [Section 1] terminates December 31, 2026.
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 202
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 202
- END -
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 202
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 202, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 202
INTRODUCED BY C. SPRUNGER, E. ALBUS, J. SECKINGER, B. CLOSE, T. SHARP, L. BENNETT, C.
COCHRAN, S. GIST, C. HINKLE, J. SCHILLINGER, J. KARLEN, B. MITCHELL, G. NIKOLAKAKOS, G.
PARRY, L. REKSTEN, S. ESSMANN, J. HINKLE
AN ACT REVISING LAWS RELATED TO THE UNLAWFUL USE OF AIRCRAFT FOR HUNTING; INCLUDING
GAME BIRDS IN THE PROTECTED SPECIES; EXTENDING THE WAITING PERIOD AFTER USE OF AN
AIRCRAFT; BANNING THE POSSESSION OF UNMANNED AERIAL VEHICLES WHILE HUNTING;
INCREASING FINES AND PENALTIES; AND AMENDING SECTION 87-6-208, MCA; AND PROVIDING
EFFECTIVE DATES AND A TERMINATION DATE.”